District of Columbia statutes.
36-404

Attorney’s fees.

The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to the prevailing party if:

(1)

A claim of misappropriation is made in bad faith;

(2)

A motion to terminate an injunction is made or resisted in bad faith; or

(3)

Willful and malicious misappropriation exists.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-216, § 5, 36 DCR 519
1981 Ed., § 48-504.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Trade Secrets Act.